Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-334 Distribution of assets.
(a) Subject to any instructions the court may give, the liquidator shall make
distributions pursuant to section 431:15-332 in a manner that will assure the
proper recognition of priorities and a reasonable balance between the
expeditious completion of the liquidation and the protection of unliquidated
and undetermined claims, including third party claims. Distribution of assets
in kind may be made at valuations set by agreement between the liquidator and
the creditor and approved by the court in advance of the distribution.

(b) The liquidator shall make distributions to
guaranty funds or associations, or foreign guaranty funds or associations
pursuant to the priority schedule of section 431:15-332 to satisfy their claims
under article 16 or similar laws of other states, if the claims have been filed
pursuant to section 431:15-325. The liquidator may protect against inequitable
allocations by making payments to funds and associations subject to binding
agreements by them to repay any portions of the distributions that are later
found to be in excess of an equitable allocation. If assets are available, the
liquidator may also lend to guaranty funds and associations, subject to express
advance court approval.

(c) The liquidator shall report to the court
within four months after the issuance of the liquidation order under section
431:15-307, and every three months thereafter on the status of the assets and
the payment of distributions and loans under subsection (b). The court may
order the liquidator to make distributions to guaranty funds and associations
under subsection (b) more expeditiously to minimize the need for assessments
under article 16 or similar laws of other states.

(d)(1) Upon liquidation of a domestic nonlife mutual
insurance company, any assets held in excess of its liabilities and the amounts
which may be paid to its members as provided under subsection (d)(2) shall be
paid into the state compliance resolution
fund.

(2) The maximum amount payable upon liquidation to
any member for and on account of such member's membership in a domestic nonlife
mutual insurance company, in addition to the insurance benefits promised in the
policy, is the total of all premium payments made by the member within the past
five years with interest at the legal rate compounded annually. [L 1987, c 347,
pt of §2; am L 1999, c 163, §15(1); am L 2002, c 39, §15; am L 2004, c 122,
§71]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next